Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-129
Drainage improvements; bonds; limitation on amount.

Bonds so issued shall be limited to the amount actually required, after taking into consideration cash payment by property owners that may be made as provided in section 31-128.

Laws 1909, c. 145, § 1, p. 505;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 21, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 1746;

C.S.1922, § 1693;

C.S.1929, § 31-129;

R.S.1943, § 31-129.